Massachusetts, session 194th, H4341.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 13F of chapter 118E of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official 
Edition, is hereby amended by adding at the end of the first paragraph the following sentence: 
Provided however, the costs of providing competent interpreter services through sign and 
spoken languages by facilities licensed under section 19 of chapter 19 of the General Laws or 
section 51 of chapter 111 of the General Laws, shall be recognized and separately reimbursed by 
the division and its contracted health insurers, health plans, health maintenance organizations, 
behavioral health management firms and third party contractors under contract to a division 
managed care organization or primary care clinician program. 
Section 2: Chapter 176O of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following 
section:- 
Section 31. “Carriers” and “Behavioral Health Managers” as defined in section 1 of 
chapter 176O and their contractors, shall recognize and separately reimburse facilities licensed 
under section 19 of chapter 19 of the General Laws or section 51 of chapter 111 of the General 

of 2 14 Laws for the costs of providing competent interpreter services through sign and spoken 
languages.